Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.050

Disablement in line of duty—Retirement.

Every firefighter who shall become disabled as a result of the performance of duty may be retired at the expiration of six months from the date of his or her disability, upon his or her written request filed with his or her retirement board. The board may, upon such request being filed, consult such medical advice as it sees fit, and may have the applicant examined by such physicians as it deems desirable. If from the reports of such physicians the board finds the applicant capable of performing his or her duties in the fire department, the board may refuse to recommend his or her retirement. If, after the expiration of six months from the date of his or her disability, the board deems it for the good of the fire department or the pension fund it may recommend the retirement of a firefighter disabled as a result of the performance of duty without any request for the same by him or her, and after having been given by the board a thirty days' written notice of such recommendation he or she shall be retired.

[ 2007 c 218 s 47; 1955 c 382 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.